Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 1. Generally

§ 35-1-201.
Exceptions with reference to religion.

Except as provided in W.S.

35-4-113

, with respect to all persons who, either on behalf of themselves or their minor children or wards, rely in good faith upon spiritual means or prayer in the free exercise of religion to prevent or cure disease, nothing in this act shall have the effect of requiring or giving any health officer or other person the right to compel any such person, minor child or ward, to go or be confined in a hospital, or other medical institution unless no other place for quarantine of such person, minor child, or ward can be secured, nor to compel any such person, child, or ward to submit to any medical treatment.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 67, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 35-9; 2003, ch. 83, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to refusal to accept family planning or birth control on religious grounds, see §

42-5-101

.

As to inapplicability to policies prescribed in connection with school health to students whose parent or guardian objects, see §

42-5-102

.

As to treatment or quarantine during a public health emergency, see §

35-4-113

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Refusal of medical treatment on religious grounds as affecting right to recover for personal injury or death, 3 ALR5th 721.

Power of court or other public agency to order medical treatment over parental religious objections for child whose life is not immediately endangered, 21 ALR5th 248.